Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 353

CORRECTIONS

Part I. Administrative
Structure, Institutions,

and Services

Section

353-1 Definitions; director
may delegate powers

353-2 Repealed

353-2.5 Repealed

353-3, 4 Repealed

353-5 Offender release
recommendations to the court

353-6 Establishment of
community correctional centers

353-6.5 Gender-responsive,
community-based programs for

female offenders

353-7 High security
correctional facility

353-8 Conditional release
centers for committed persons

353-9 Establishment of
temporary correctional facilities

353-10 Intake service centers

353-10.5 Intermediate sanctions;
eligibility; criteria and

conditions

353-11 Access to correctional
facilities and records;

instituting of inquiries
and securing information

353-11.5 Restricted access to
correctional facilities

353-12 Correctional records,
documents

353-12.5 Public assistance;
inmates; monthly reports to

department of human
services

353-13 Examination by medical
officer

353-13.1 Nonemergency medical,
dental, mental health services or

treatment; intentional
injury; payment by inmates

353-13.2 Repealed

353-13.3 Mental health care

353-13.4 Substance abuse testing
of inmates

353-13.5 Election of private
medical or psychological

care by prisoners

353-13.6 Involuntary medical
treatment criteria

353-13.7
Initiation of proceeding for involuntary medical

treatment

353-13.8 Notice; waiver of
notice; hearing on petition;

waiver of hearing on
petition for involuntary

medical treatment

353-13.9 Hearing on petition

353-14 Cash furnished
discharged committed person, when

353-15 Transfer of committed
persons affected with

communicable disease

353-16 Transfer of committed
felon to federal institution

353-16.2 Transfer of inmates to
out-of-state institutions

353-16.3 Development of
out-of-state Hawaii correctional

facilities

353-16.35 Development or expansion
of in-state correctional

facilities

353-16.36 Contracts for
construction of correctional facilities

by private entities

353-16.37 Community partnering

353-16.5 Transfer of offenders
under treaty; authority of

governor

353-17 Committed persons,
furlough, employment

353-18 Director to fix
committed persons' compensation

353-19 Compensation for labor
or training by committed

persons

353-20 Custody of moneys;
accounts for committed persons,

etc.

353-21 Withdrawals;
forfeitures; etc.

353-22 Earnings exempt from
garnishment, etc.

353-22.5 Garnishment to cover
nonbudgeted costs

353-22.6 Victim restitution

353-22.8 Orders for payment of
child support

353-23 Disposition of property
subject to action for damages

353-24 Conservators of
committed persons, appointed when

353-25 Powers and duties of
conservator

353-26 Removal of conservator

353-27 Compensation; expenses

353-28 Property given to
committed persons

353-28.5 Visits from family members

353-29 What officials may visit

353-30 Others by permission

353-31 Revolving funds for
correctional facility stores

353-32 Gifts

353-33 Repealed

353-34 Probation services fee;
assessment

353-35 Incarcerated parents; data collection

Part II. Paroles and
Pardons

353-61 Hawaii paroling
authority; appointment; tenure;

qualifications

353-62 Hawaii paroling
authority; responsibilities and

duties; operations;
records, reports, staff

353-63 Service of Hawaii
paroling authority members;

compensation; expenses

353-63.5 Intermediate sanctions;
eligibility; criteria and

conditions

353-64 Committed persons
paroled

353-65 Paroles; rules

353-65.5 Reports to county clerk

353-66 Terms and conditions of
parole; suspension and

revocation

353-66.5 Suspension or
revocation; arrest warrants arising

from traffic violations

353-67 Education as condition
for paroles

353-68 Parole, how initiated
and granted

353-69 Parole when

353-70 Final discharge

353-71 Parole officer and
assistant parole officers

353-72 Pardons; reference to
paroling authority

Part III. Interstate
Parole and Probation

Compact--Repealed

353-81, 82 Repealed

Part IV. County Jails
-- Repealed

353-91 to 96 Repealed

Part V. Federal and
Military Prisoners, Custody of

353-101 Authorization to
director of public safety or the

appropriate officer and
the governor

353-102 Repealed

353-103 Validity of existing
contracts

Part VI. Pregnant
Offenders; Restraints

353-121 Definitions

353-122 Limitation on use of
restraints

353-123 Enforcement

Part VII. Automated
Victim Information and Notification

System

353-131 Definitions

353-132 System; requirements

353-133 Satisfaction of victims'
rights to notification

353-134 Compliance by
department; no cause of action

353-135 Law enforcement
cooperation

353-136 Automated victim information
and notification system

special fund; authorization of
payment

353-137 Automated victim
information and notification system

governance committee

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 1987, c 338, §3(1); L 1989, c
211, §7.

Incarcerated parents; forms or questions to
ask offenders upon intake; plan for management of data collected and public
disclosure of data. L 2015, c 16, §3.

Parent-child interaction programs. L 2007,
c 250.

Reports to 2018-2020 legislature on release
of misdemeanants to prevent overcrowding. L 2016, c 217, §3.

Cross References

Cession of concurrent jurisdiction, see
§1-4.5.

Criminal offender treatment act, see
chapter 353G.

Department of public safety, see chapter
353C.

Drug demand reduction assessments; special
fund, see §706-650.

Forensic identification, see chapter 844D.

Notice of prisoner escape, see §706-673.

Sexual assaults in prison, see §353C-8.

Transfer of youth corrections functions,
see §352D-4.

Case Notes

Neither this chapter nor chapter 706
prohibits the Hawaii paroling authority from setting a prisoner's minimum term
at a period equal to his or her maximum sentence. 97 H. 183, 35 P.3d 210 (2001).

Community correctional center holding unit was not a
"facility". 7 H. App. 247, 753 P.2d 816 (1988).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next